Utah statutes.
78B-2-209.   Adverse possession -- Presumption -- Proviso -- Tax title.

(1)  In an action for the recovery or possession of real property, to quiet title to or determine the property's owner, the person establishing a legal title to the property is presumed to have been in possession of the property within the time required by law.  The occupation of the property by any other person is considered to have been under and in subordination to the legal title, unless it appears that the property has been held and possessed adversely to the legal title for seven years before the commencement of the action.

(2)  If in any action a party establishes prima facie evidence of ownership of any real property under a tax title held by him and his predecessors for four years prior to the commencement of the action, he is presumed to be the owner of the property by adverse possession.  This presumption may be rebutted if it appears that the owner of the legal title or his predecessor has actually occupied or been in possession of the property under the title or that the tax title owner and his predecessors have failed to pay all the taxes levied or assessed upon the property within the four-year period.

